California statutes. Vehicle Code
(d) The department may, pending a hearing, temporarily suspend the license issued to a registration service for not more than 30 days if the director finds that action is required in the public interest. In that case, a hearing shall be held and a decision issued within 30 days after notice of the temporary suspension or cancellation.

(e) The director may, following the filing of a statement of issues or an accusation against an applicant or a registration service, with the consent of the applicant or licensee, enter into a compromise settlement agreement with a stipulated restriction or penalty whereby the applicant or licensee accepts the terms and conditions of the agreement without hearing or appeal by any party thereto. 

(1) The compromise settlement agreement may provide for a restricted license, special operating terms and conditions, a higher bond, a monetary penalty, or any other term or condition agreeable to the parties.

(2) The compromise settlement agreement shall be signed by the respondent applicant or licensee, the director, and the accuser, or their authorized representatives, and filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings, together with the department’s notice of withdrawal of the statement of issues or the accusation upon which the action was initiated.

(3) A failure of the respondent applicant or licensee to carry out a compromise settlement agreement entered into under this section is a separate cause to refuse to issue, or to suspend, revoke, or cancel, any license authorizing the respondent to act as a registration service.

(f) Any person whose license to act as a registration service was suspended for cause and the terms of the suspension are unfulfilled, or whose license was revoked for cause, may reapply for a license to act as a registration service after not less than one year from the effective date of the suspension or revocation action.

(g) The issuance of a new license to that person is within the sole discretion of the department, and a hearing regarding that issuance shall be held only upon the consent of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1196, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

11409.

The fee for a license issued to a registration service is as follows:

(a) For the original license, or an ownership change which requires a new application, one hundred fifty dollars ($150), which is nonrefundable.

(b) For the annual renewal of a license, fifteen dollars ($15).

(c) For the alteration of an existing license required by a name change, address change, change in corporate officer structure, or the addition of a branch location, seventy dollars ($70).

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1196, Sec. 3.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

11410.

(a) Every license issued under this chapter is valid for a period of one year from the last day of the month of issuance. Except as provided in subdivision (c), renewal of the license for the ensuing year may be obtained by the person to whom the license was issued upon application to the department and payment of the fee required by Section 11409.

(b) An application for the renewal of a license shall be made by the licensee not more than 90 days prior to the expiration date and shall be made by presenting the completed application form provided by the department and by payment of the renewal fee.

(c) If the application for renewal of the license is not made by midnight of the expiration date, the application may be made within 30 days following expiration of the license by paying the annual renewal fee and a penalty fee equal to the amount of the original application fee for each license held.

(d) A licensee shall not renew the license after the expiration of the 30-day period specified in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 218.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

11411.

If a registration service ceases operation for any reason, the owner of the service immediately shall notify the department and, upon demand by the department, shall deliver to the department the registration service license, all records kept pursuant to Section 11406, and all customer transactions then in his or her possession, including any fees or receipts for fees due to the department or to the customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 77.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

11413.

The suspension, expiration, or cancellation of a registration service license provided for in this chapter shall not prevent the filing of an accusation for the revocation or suspension of the suspended, expired, or canceled license as provided in Section 11405 or 11408 or any related rules or regulations, and the department’s decision that the license should be suspended or revoked. That determination may be considered in granting or refusing to grant any subsequent license authorized by this division to that licensee or to a business representative of that prior licensee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Automobile Dismantlers [11500. - 11541.]

11500.

(a) (1) It shall be unlawful for any person to act as an automobile dismantler without first having an established place of business that meets the requirements set forth in Section 11514 and without first having procured a license or temporary permit issued by the department, or when such license or temporary permit has been canceled, suspended, revoked, invalidated, expired, or the terms and conditions of an agreement effected pursuant to Section 11509.1 have not been fulfilled. A violation of this subdivision is a misdemeanor, and is subject to the penalties described in paragraph (2).

(2) Notwithstanding Section 42002, a person convicted of a first violation of subdivision (a) for any reason other than described in paragraph (3) shall be
 punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). A person convicted of a second separate violation of subdivision (a) for this reason shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500). A person convicted of a third or subsequent violation of subdivision (a) for this reason shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(3) A person who violates subdivision (a) due to possessing nine or more catalytic converters that have been cut from a vehicle pursuant to Section 220 is, for a first violation, guilty of an infraction punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100). A person convicted of a second separate violation of subdivision (a) for this reason is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). A person convicted of a third separate violation of subdivision (a) for this reason is guilty of a misdemeanor
 punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500). A person convicted of a fourth or subsequent violation of subdivision (a) for this reason is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(b) (1) A building or place used for the purpose of automobile dismantling in violation of subdivision (a) is a public nuisance subject to being enjoined, abated, and prevented, and for which damages may be recovered by any public body or officer.

(2) As used in this section, “public body” means any state agency, county, city, district, or any other political subdivision of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 495, Sec. 14.   (SB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11501.

Every automobile dismantler shall make application to the department upon the appropriate form for a license containing a general distinguishing number. The applicant shall submit proof of his status as a bona fide automobile dismantler as may reasonably be required by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

The department shall have the power and duty to issue and for reasonable cause shown to refuse to issue a license. The department may refuse to any applicant therefor a license provided for herein, if such applicant does not meet the requirements of the terms and provisions of this code relating to the conduct of an automobile dismantling business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

The department may refuse to issue a license to an applicant when it determines any of the following:

(a) The applicant was previously the holder, or a managerial employee of the holder, of a license issued under this chapter which was revoked for cause and never reissued by the department, or which was suspended for cause and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled.

(b) The applicant was previously a business representative whose license issued under this chapter was revoked for cause and never reissued or was suspended for cause and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled.

(c) If the applicant is a business, a business representative was previously the holder of a license, or was a business representative of a business whose license, issued under this chapter was revoked for cause and never reissued or was suspended for cause and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled; or, by reason of the facts and circumstances related to the organization, control, and management of the business, the operation of that business will be directed, controlled, or managed by individuals who, by reason of their conviction of violations of this code, would be ineligible for a license and, by licensing that business, the purposes of this chapter would be defeated.

(d) The applicant, or a business representative if the applicant is a business, has been convicted of a crime or has committed any act or engaged in conduct involving moral turpitude which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(e) The applicant was previously the holder of an occupational license issued by another state, authorizing the same or similar activities of a license issued under this division; and that license was revoked or suspended for cause and was never reissued, or was suspended for cause, and the terms of suspension have not been fulfilled.

(f) The information contained in an application is incorrect.

(g) A decision of the department to cancel, suspend, or revoke a license has been made, and the applicant was a business representative of the business regulated under that license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.1.

Any of the causes specified in this chapter as a cause to suspend or revoke the license issued to an automobile dismantler is cause to refuse to issue a license to an automobile dismantler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.5.

(a) The department, after notice and hearing, on an interim basis, may refuse to issue or may suspend a license issued under this chapter when the applicant or licensee, or a business representative if the applicant or licensee is a business, has been convicted of a crime involving moral turpitude which is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensed activity, if an appeal of the conviction is pending or the conviction has otherwise not become final. A conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is a conviction within the meaning of this section.

(b) When a conviction, upon which an interim refusal to issue or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is affirmed on appeal or otherwise becomes final, the refusal to issue or suspension shall automatically take effect as a denial or revocation, as the case may be, of the license. If the interim refusal to issue or suspension was stayed under probationary terms and conditions, the subsequent automatic denial or revocation shall also be stayed under the same terms and conditions for a term not to exceed the original term of probation for the interim refusal or suspension.

(c) If a conviction, upon which an interim refusal to issue or suspension under subdivision (a) is based, is reversed on appeal, the refusal or suspension shall be set aside immediately by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

11504.

(a) An applicant who applies for a license pursuant to Section 11501 shall submit an application to the department on the forms prescribed by the department. The applicant shall provide the department with information as to the applicant’s character, honesty, integrity, and reputation, as the department may consider necessary. The department, by regulation, shall prescribe what information is required of the applicant for the purposes of this subdivision, and the applicant shall provide that information under penalty of perjury. In addition to any other information required by the department, the department shall require the applicant to furnish all of the following information on any application for a new license or the renewal of a license, if the applicant is required by other
 provisions of law to have the following permits, numbers, or plan:

(1) Board of Equalization resale permit number.

(2) Identification number issued by the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(3) A statement indicating that the applicant has either filed an application for a stormwater permit or is not required to obtain a stormwater permit.

(4) A statement indicating that the applicant has either filed a hazardous materials business plan or is not required to file that plan.

(5) The tax identification number assigned by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Upon receipt of an application for a new license that is accompanied by the appropriate fee, the department shall, not later than 120 days from the receipt of that application, make a thorough investigation of all of the information contained in the application.

(c) (1) Upon
 receipt of an application for renewal of a license that is accompanied by the appropriate fee, the department shall, not later than 120 days from the receipt of that application, make a thorough investigation of the information contained in the application, except the information specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(2) As of January 1, 2011, upon receipt of an application for the renewal of a license that is accompanied by the appropriate fee, the department shall, not later than 120 days from the receipt of that application, make a thorough investigation of all of the information contained in the application.

(d) A person holding a license issued pursuant to Section 11501 shall notify the department, within 10 days, of any change in the ownership or corporate structure of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 475, Sec. 1.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11505.

(a) The department, upon granting a license shall issue to the applicant a license containing the applicant’s name and address and the general distinguishing number assigned to the applicant.

(b) When the department has issued a license pursuant to subdivision (a), the licensee may apply for and the department shall issue special plates which shall have displayed thereon the general distinguishing number assigned to the applicant. Each plate so issued shall also contain a number or symbol identifying the plate from every other plate bearing a like general distinguishing number.

(c) The department shall also furnish books and forms as it may determine necessary, which books and forms are and shall remain the property of the department and may be taken up at any time for inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

11506.

Except where the provisions of this code require the refusal to issue a license, the department may issue a license restricted by conditions to be observed in the exercise of the privilege granted. The terms and conditions to be attached to the exercise of the privilege under such restricted license shall be such as may, in the judgment of the department, be in the public interest and suitable to the qualifications of the applicant as disclosed by the application and investigation by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

11507.

Pending the satisfaction of the department that the applicant has met the requirements under this code, it may issue a temporary permit to any person applying for an automobile dismantler license. The temporary permit shall permit the operation by the automobile dismantler for a period not to exceed 120 days while the department is completing its investigation and determination of all facts relative to the qualification of the applicant to such license. The department may cancel such temporary permit when it has determined or has reasonable cause to believe that the application is incorrect or incomplete or the temporary permit was issued in error. Such temporary permit shall be invalid when canceled or when the applicant’s license has been issued or refused.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

11508.

(a) Every occupational license and special plate issued under this chapter shall be valid for a period of one year from midnight of the last day of the month of issuance. Renewal of the occupational license and special plates for the ensuing year may be obtained by the person to whom any plates and license were issued upon application to the department and payment of the fee provided in this code.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), every application for the renewal of an occupational license and special plates which expire pursuant to this section shall be made by the person to whom issued not more than 90 days prior to the expiration date, and shall be made by presenting the completed application form provided by the department and by payment of the full annual renewal fee for the occupational license and special plates.

(c) If the application for renewal of the occupational license and special plates is not made by midnight of the expiration date, the application may be made within 30 days following expiration of the license by paying the annual renewal fee and a penalty fee equal to the amount of the original application fee for each occupational license held. A penalty as specified in Sections 9553 and 9554 shall also be added to each special plate renewed during the 30-day period following expiration of the special plates.

(d) In no event may the licensee renew the occupational license or special plates after the expiration of the 30-day period authorized in subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 499, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

11509.

(a) The department, after notice and hearing, may suspend or revoke the license issued to an automobile dismantler upon the determination that the person to whom the license was issued is not lawfully entitled thereto or has done any of the following:

(1) Made or knowingly or negligently permitted any illegal use of the special plates issued to him or her.

(2) Used a false or fictitious name or knowingly made any false statement or concealed any material fact in any application or other document filed with the department.

(3) Failed to provide and maintain a clear physical division between the type of business licensed pursuant to this chapter and any other type of business conducted at the established place of business.

(4) Violated any provision of Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000) or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(5) Violated any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 10500) or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(6) Violated any provision of this chapter, except Section 11520, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(7) Knowingly, repeatedly, or flagrantly violated Section 11520.

(8) Violated any provision of Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(9) Purchased, concealed, possessed, or otherwise acquired or disposed of a vehicle, or a part thereof, knowing it to be stolen.

(10) Failed to meet and maintain the requirements for the issuance of an automobile dismantler’s license as provided in this code.

(11) Failed to pay, within 30 days after written demand from the department, any fees or penalties due on vehicles acquired for dismantling which are not the subject of dispute. If the dismantler disputes the validity of the fees or penalties, the 30-day period shall not commence until the department, after review, has determined the fee or penalty to be due.

(12) Submitted a check, draft, or money order to the department for any obligation or fees due the state, and it is thereafter dishonored or refused payment upon presentation.

(13) Failed to meet the terms and conditions of a previous agreement entered into pursuant to Section 11509.1.

(b) Any of the causes specified in this chapter as a cause for refusal to issue a license to an automobile dismantler applicant is cause, after notice and hearing, to suspend or revoke a license and special plates issued to an automobile dismantler.

(c) Except as provided in Section 11509.1, every hearing provided for in this chapter shall be held pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

11509.1.

(a) After the filing of an accusation under this chapter, the director may enter into a stipulated compromise settlement agreement with the consent of the licensee on terms and conditions mutually agreeable to the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser without further hearing or appeal. The agreement may include, but is not limited to, a period of probation or monetary penalties, or both. The monetary penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation, and it shall be based on the nature of the violation and the effect of the violation on the purposes of this chapter.

(b) A compromise settlement agreement may be entered before, during, or after the hearing, but is valid only if executed and filed pursuant to subdivision (d) before the proposed decision of the hearing officer, if any, is adopted or the case is decided.

(c) The department shall adopt, by regulation, a schedule of maximum and minimum amounts of monetary penalties, the payment of which may be included as a term or condition of a compromise settlement agreement entered under subdivision (a). Any monetary penalty included in a compromise settlement agreement shall be within the range of monetary penalties in that schedule.

(d) Any compromise settlement agreement entered under this section shall be signed by the director, the respondent licensee, and the accuser, or by their authorized representatives. The director shall file, or cause to be filed, the agreement with the Office of Administrative Hearings, together with the department’s notice of withdrawal of the accusation or statement of issues upon which the action was initiated.

(e) If the respondent licensee fails to perform all of the terms and conditions of the compromise settlement agreement, the agreement is void and the department may take any action authorized by law notwithstanding the agreement, including, but not limited to, refiling the accusation or imposing license sanctions.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1022, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

11509.5.

A person whose automobile dismantler’s license has been revoked or whose application for a license has been denied may reapply for such license after a period of not less than one year has elapsed from the effective date of the decision revoking the license or denying the application; provided, however, that if such decision was based upon paragraph (3), (9), or (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 11509, or Section 11513, an earlier reapplication may be made accompanied by evidence satisfactory to the department that such grounds no longer exist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

11510.

The department may, pending a hearing, temporarily suspend the license and special plates issued to an automobile dismantler for a period not to exceed 30 days if the director finds that such action is required in the public interest. In any such case a hearing shall be held and a decision thereon issued within 30 days after notice of temporary suspension.

Every hearing as provided for in this section shall be pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1214.)
-------------------------------------------

11511.

In any administrative action to revoke or suspend an automobile dismantler’s license:

(a) Proof that a stolen vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code, or a part thereof, was found in the possession of, or upon the premises of, the dismantler shall constitute in evidence a prima facie presumption that the dismantler had knowledge that the vehicle was stolen. This presumption may be rebutted by satisfactory evidence that the dismantler has complied with paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 11520.

(b) Proof that a vehicle of a type subject to registration under this code is found in a partially dismantled condition in the possession of, or upon the premises of, the dismantler shall constitute in evidence a prima facie presumption that the vehicle was partially dismantled by the dismantler. The presumption may be rebutted by a business record of the dismantler reflecting the partially dismantled condition of the vehicle on the date of acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 466, Sec. 109.)
-------------------------------------------

11512.

(a) Upon refusal of the department to issue a license to an automobile dismantler the applicant shall be entitled to demand in writing a hearing before the director or his representative within 60 days after notice of refusal.

(b) The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

11513.

(a) The department shall not issue an automobile dismantler’s license to any applicant for that license who has not an established place of business as defined in this code. If the automobile dismantler changes the site or location of his or her established place of business, he or she shall immediately upon making the change notify the department. If the automobile dismantler, for any reason ceases to be in possession of an established place of business from and on which he or she conducts the business for which he or she is licensed, he or she shall immediately notify the department and, upon demand by the department, shall deliver to the department the automobile dismantler’s license, and all books and forms provided by the department in his or her possession.

(b) Any person licensed under this chapter who has closed his or her established place of business may be served with process issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code by registered mail at that place of business, unless the person has notified the department in writing of another address where service may be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 751, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

11514.

(a) An automobile dismantler’s established place of business and such other sites or locations as may be operated and maintained by such automobile dismantler in conjunction with his principal established place of business shall have posted, in a place conspicuous to the public in each and every site or location, the license issued by the department and shall have erected or posted thereon such signs or devices providing information relating to the automobile dismantler’s name and the location and address of his established place of business so as to enable any person doing business with such automobile dismantler to identify him properly. Every such sign erected or posted on an established place of business shall have an area of not less than 32 square feet per side displayed and shall contain lettering not less than six inches in height. The sign shall indicate the nature of the dismantler’s business by inclusion of “Automobile Dismantler”, “Automobile Wrecker”, “Motorcycle Dismantler”, “Trailer Dismantler”, “Vehicle Dismantler”, or a combination of such designations on such sign.

(b) Any local authority may provide for a sign and lettering smaller than that specified in subdivision (a); however, no local authority shall require a sign to have an area of less than four square feet per side displayed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

11515.

(a) (1) Whenever an insurance company makes a total loss settlement on a total loss salvage vehicle, the insurance company, an occupational licensee of the department authorized by the insurance company, or a salvage pool authorized by the insurance company, within 10 days from the settlement of the loss, shall forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15), to the department. An occupational licensee of the department may submit a certificate of license plate destruction in lieu of the actual license plate.

(2) If an insurance company, an occupational licensee of the
 department authorized by the insurance company, or a salvage pool authorized by the insurance company is unable to obtain the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department within 15 days following oral or written acceptance by the owner of an offer of an amount in settlement of a total loss, that insurance company, licensee, or salvage pool, on a form provided by the department and signed under penalty of perjury, may request the department to issue a salvage certificate for the vehicle. The request shall attest that the requester has
 attempted to obtain the certificate of ownership or other acceptable evidence of title, and shall include the license plates and fee described in paragraph (1). The attempt to obtain the certificate of ownership or other acceptable evidence of title shall be provided concurrently with the payment of the claim or by first-class mail, certificate of mailing, certified mail, other commercially available delivery service showing proof of delivery, or electronic mail.

(3) The department, upon receipt of the certificate of ownership, other evidence of title, or properly executed request described in paragraph (2), the license plates, and
 the fee, shall issue a salvage certificate for the vehicle.

(b) Whenever the owner of a total loss salvage vehicle retains possession of the vehicle, the insurance company shall notify the department of the retention on a form prescribed by the department. The insurance company shall also notify the insured or owner of the insured’s or owner’s responsibility to comply with this subdivision. The owner shall, within 10 days from the settlement of the loss, forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to the department. The department, upon receipt of the certificate of ownership or other evidence of title, the license plates, and the fee, shall issue a salvage certificate for the vehicle.

(c) Whenever a total loss salvage vehicle is not the subject of an insurance settlement, the owner shall, within 10 days from the loss, forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to the department.

(d) Whenever a total loss salvage vehicle is not the subject of an insurance settlement, a self-insurer, as defined in Section 16052, shall, within 10 days from the loss, forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to the department.

(e) Prior to
 the sale or disposal of a total loss salvage vehicle, the owner, owner’s agent, or salvage pool, shall obtain a properly endorsed salvage certificate and deliver it to the purchaser within 10 days after payment in full for the salvage vehicle and shall also comply with Section 5900. The department shall accept the endorsed salvage certificate in lieu of the certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership when accompanied by an application and other documents and fees, including, but not limited to, the fees required by Section 9265, as may be required by the department.

(f) This section does not apply to a vehicle that has been driven or taken without the consent of the owner thereof, until the vehicle has been recovered by the owner and only if the vehicle is a total loss salvage vehicle.

(g) A violation of subdivision (a), (b), (d), or (e) is a misdemeanor, pursuant to Section 40000.11. Notwithstanding Section 40000.11, a violation of subdivision (c) is an infraction, except that, if committed with the intent to defraud, a violation of subdivision (c) is a misdemeanor.

(h) (1) A salvage certificate issued pursuant to this section shall include a statement that the seller and subsequent sellers that transfer ownership of a total loss vehicle pursuant to a properly endorsed salvage certificate are required to disclose to the purchaser at, or prior to, the time of sale that the vehicle has been declared a total loss salvage vehicle.

(2) Effective on and after the department includes in the salvage certificate form the statement described in
 paragraph (1), a seller who fails to make the disclosure described in paragraph (1) shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(3) Nothing in this subdivision affects any other civil remedy provided by law, including, but not limited to, punitive damages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   (AB 2330)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11515.1.

A salvage pool shall sell a vehicle only with either of the following:

(a) A salvage certificate, except those vehicles described in subdivision (f) of Section 11515, which may be sold with a certificate of title.

(b) A nonrepairable vehicle certificate, except those vehicles described in subdivision (f) of Section 11515.2, which may be sold with a certificate of title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1008, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 19 of Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

11515.2.

(a) (1) If an insurance company makes a total loss settlement on a nonrepairable vehicle and takes possession of that vehicle, either itself or through an agent, the insurance company, an occupational licensee of the department authorized by the insurance company, or a salvage pool authorized by the insurance company, shall, within 10 days after receipt of title by the insurer, free and clear of all liens, forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to the department. An occupational licensee of the department may submit a certificate of license plate destruction in lieu of the actual license plate. The department, upon
 receipt of the certificate of ownership or other evidence of title, the license plates, and the fee, shall issue a nonrepairable vehicle certificate for the vehicle.

(2) If an insurance company, an occupational licensee of the department authorized by the insurance company, or a salvage pool authorized by the insurance company is unable to obtain the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department within 15 days following oral or written acceptance by the owner of an offer of an amount in settlement of a total loss, that insurance company, licensee, or salvage pool, on a form provided by the department and signed under penalty of perjury, may request the department to issue a nonrepairable vehicle
 certificate for the vehicle. The request shall
 attest that the requester has attempted to obtain the certificate of ownership or other acceptable evidence of title, and shall include the license plates and fee described in paragraph (1). The attempt to obtain the certificate of ownership or other acceptable evidence of title shall be submitted concurrently with the payment of the claim or by first-class mail, certificate of mailing, certified mail, other commercially available delivery service showing proof of delivery, or electronic mail.

(3) The department, upon receipt of the certificate of ownership, other evidence
 of title, or properly executed request described in paragraph (2), the license plates, and the fee, shall issue a nonrepairable vehicle certificate for the vehicle.

(b) If the owner of a nonrepairable vehicle retains possession of the vehicle, the insurance company shall notify the department of the retention on a form prescribed by the department. The insurance company shall also notify the insured or owner of the insured’s or owner’s responsibility to comply with this subdivision. The owner shall, within 10 days from the settlement of the loss, forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to the department. The department, upon receipt of the certificate of ownership or other evidence of title, the license plates, and the fee, shall issue a nonrepairable vehicle certificate for the vehicle.

(c) If a nonrepairable vehicle is not the subject of an insurance settlement, the owner shall, within 10 days from the loss, forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to the department.

(d) If a nonrepairable vehicle is not the subject of an insurance settlement, a self-insurer, as defined in Section 16052, shall, within 10 days of the loss, forward the properly endorsed certificate of ownership or other evidence of ownership acceptable to the department, the license plates, and a fee in the amount of fifteen dollars ($15) to the department.
